Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-2916
Student, defined.

Student means a person enrolled in an approved educational program.

Laws 2006, LB 994, § 134;

R.S.Supp.,2006, § 71-1,378;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 1009.